Arkansas, session 2025, HB1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1414(a)(3)(A), concerning the content
of the uniform petition, is amended to read as follows:
(A) The uniform petition shall include a statement
verified under oath indicating:
(i) whether Whether the petitioner has felony
charges pending in any state or federal court and the status of the pending
felony charges as well as;
(ii) Whether the petitioner is subject to an active
warrant of arrest issued by any court; and
(iii) whether Whether the person is required to
register as a sex offender under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, §
12-12-901 et seq.
*CEB044*
01/08/2025 12:38:45 PM CEB044

HB1136
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-90-1415, concerning the burden of proof
and standard of review for a uniform petition, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) A court shall not grant a uniform petition to seal under § 16-90-
1413 when the person is subject to an active warrant of arrest issued by any
court.






























01/08/2025 12:38:45 PM CEB044